src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON n1
 +N: x1 ;

LEXICON x1
 +Sg+Nom:^E2I       K ;
 +Sg+Gen:^WG%>n K ;
 +Sg+Par:%>^A K ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ;
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A K ;
 +Sg+Ade:^WG%>l^A K ;
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>i2en K ;
 +Pl+Par:%>i2^A K ;
 +Pl+Ine:^WG%>i2ss^A K ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vin K ;
 +Pl+Ade:^WG%>i2l^A K ;

LEXICON n2
 +N: x2 ;

LEXICON x2
 +Sg+Nom:^WG       K ;
 +Sg+Gen:h%>en     K ; ! liikheen, säkheen
 +Sg+Par:^WG%>tt^A K ; ! liikettä, säettä
 +Sg+Ill:h%>en     K ; ! liikheen, säkheen
 +Sg+Ine:%>ess^A   K ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä
 +Sg+Ade:%>el^A    K ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä
 +Sg+Abl:%>elt^A   K ; ! liikheeltä, säkheeltä
 +Pl+Nom:h%>et     K ;
 +Pl+Gen:h%>ejen   K ;
 +Pl+Par:h%>ej^A   K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>en      K ; ! liikheen, säkheen
 +Pl+Ine:%>ess^A   K ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä
 +Pl+Ade:%>el^A    K ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä

LEXICON nen
 +N: xnen ;

LEXICON xnen
 +Sg+Nom:nen       K ;
 +Sg+Gen:se^WG%>n K ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A K ;
 +Sg+Ill:sheen   K ;    ! liikheen, säkheen
 +Sg+Ine:se^WG%>ss^A K ;
 +Sg+Ade:se^WG%>ll^A K ;
 +Pl+Nom:se^WG%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>ten K ;
 +Pl+Par:s%>i^A K ;
 +Pl+Ine:s^WG%>i2ss^A K ;
 +Pl+Ill:shiin   K ;    !
 +Pl+Ade:s%>i2ll^A    K ;  ! evt se>i2ll^A

LEXICON n3
 +N: x3 ;

LEXICON x3
 +Sg+Nom:^E2I       K ;
 +Sg+Gen:^WG%>n K ;
 +Sg+Par:%>^A K ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ;
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A K ;
 +Sg+Ade:^WG%>ll^A K ;
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>i2en K ;
 +Pl+Par:%>i2^A K ;
 +Pl+Ine:^WG%>i2ss^A K ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vin K ;
 +Pl+Ade:^WG%>i2ll^A K ;


  
LEXICON n4
 +N: x4 ;

LEXICON x4 ! veri
 +Sg+Nom:^E2I       K ; ! veri
 +Sg+Gen:^WG%>n     K ; ! veren
 +Sg+Par:%>t^A      K ; ! verta
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A  K ; ! veressä
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ;
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A K ;
 +Sg+Ade:^WG%>l^A K ;
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>i2en K ;
 +Pl+Par:%>i2^A K ;
 +Pl+Ine:^WG%>i2ss^A K ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vin K ;
 +Pl+Ade:^WG%>i2l^A K ;


LEXICON nks
 +Sg+Nom:       K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>n K ;
 +Sg+Par:%>t^A K ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ;
 +Sg+Ine:%>ss^A K ;
 +Sg+Ade:%>ll^A K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ten K ;
 +Pl+Par:%>i2^A K ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>i2ss^A K ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vin K ;
 +Pl+Ade:%>i2ll^A K ;


LEXICON nas
 +Sg+Nom:^WG       K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%>n K ;
 +Sg+Par:^WG%>t^A K ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ;
 +Sg+Ine:a%>ss^A K ;
 +Sg+Ade:a%>ll^A K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>i2den K ;
 +Pl+Par:a%>i2t^A K ;
 +Pl+Ine:a%>i2ss^A K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a^HMETA%>h^Vin K ;
 +Pl+Ade:a%>i2ll^A K ;






!! !Sublexica for possessive suffixes
! ---------------------------------

!! Px is now not in use, with one exception, comitative.

LEXICON n_PxK  !!= @CODE@ has either -n or goes to Px
  :n K  ;
!    Px ;

LEXICON i_PxK  !!= @CODE@ Tra: -i or -e and goes to Px
  :i K  ;
! :e Px ;

LEXICON PxK !!= @CODE@ has only -nsA, and is currently not in use. Check
   K  ;
!  Px ;

LEXICON PxxK  !!= @CODE@ has also -Vn, thus both .. llensa and ..lleen.
   K     ;
!  Px    ;
!  Px-Vn ;

LEXICON Pxx
  Px    ;
  Px-Vn ;

LEXICON Px
 +PxSg1:%>ni    K ;
 +PxSg2:%>sti   K ;
 +PxSg3:%>ns%^A K ;
 +PxPl1:%>mm^A  K ; ! NB! -m^A ei hoidettu
 +PxPl2:%>nn^A  K ; ! NB! -n^A ei hoidettu
 +PxPl3:%>ns%^A K ;


LEXICON Px-Vn
 +PxSg3:%>%^Vn K ;
 +PxPl3:%>%^Vn K ;
