src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot
sana n1 ;
kala n1 ;
taakka n1 ;
rieska n1 ;
sakka n1 ;
mustikka n3 ;
uppura n1 ; ! uppuroissa
kuva n1 ;
luokka n1 ;
kissa n1 ;

poro n1 ;

kuru n1 ;

leppä n1 ;
päivä n1 ;

liike:liikke n2 ; ! liikettä
säe:säke n2 ;

käpy n1 ;
häpy n1 ;

joki:joke n1 ;
jälki:jälke n1 ;
veri:vere n4 ;
varsi:varte n1 ;

siili n1 ;
silli n1 ;
keppi n1 ;
väri n1 ;
vesi:vete n1 ;
varsi:varte n1 ;

hevonen:hevo nen ;

keskus:keskukse nks ;
tehas:tehtas nas ;
